Utah statutes.
9-4-630.   Investment in authority authorized.
(1)  The state, public officers, political subdivisions, public bodies, banks,
bankers, trust companies, savings banks and institutions, building and loan
associations, savings and loan associations, investment companies, insurance
companies, insurance associations, other persons carrying on a banking or
insurance business, executors, administrators, guardians, trustees, and other
fiduciaries may legally invest money or funds belonging to them or within
their control in any bonds or other obligations issued by a housing authority
created under this part or issued by any public housing authority or agency in
the United States, any of its territories, the District of Columbia, Puerto
Rico, Guam, or the Virgin Islands.
(2)  These bonds or other obligations shall be secured by a pledge of annual
contributions or other financial assistance to be paid by the United States
government or any of its agencies, or by an agreement between the United
States government or any of its agencies and the public housing authority or
agency in which the United States government or its agency  agrees to lend to
the public housing authority or agency, prior to the maturity of the bonds or
other obligations, moneys in an amount which, together with any other moneys
irrevocably committed to the payment of interest on the bonds or other
obligations, will suffice to pay the principal of the bonds or other
obligations with interest to maturity.
(3)  These moneys, under the terms of the agreement, shall be required to be
used for this purpose, and the bonds and other obligations shall be authorized
security for all public deposits and shall be fully negotiable in this state.
(4)  Nothing contained in this section may be construed to relieve any person,
firm, or corporation from any duty of exercising reasonable care in selecting
securities.
(5)  The provisions of this section apply notwithstanding any restrictions on
investments contained in other laws.
